Note
Search Substack


The Urizen





I fled through the rain to where the starved horses were. Where the black cities and beer set the snakes to twist in the other place. Eyes black and under them too. The windows were dripping. Everything in this place is slightly red. There are mirrors on the wall and tables with stools. It is shit. See she called from beyond with her pale skin and her lips like the berries in the North and that's where the sky thrashes. It thrashes like it's full of black riders riding through the torsion and alkahest, not the blackclouds heaving like Saharan girls in ecstasy but like riders riding from the endless energy of life. Sick. Arabs. Blacks. Any and all of them I could feel the pangs of genocide. I could feel it burning and then I'd close my eyes and images of dreams of visions would climb up my spine and strangle me down to the muck and the burning. See there is a like a poor in me. A poor has been in me for 10 years. You could call it something or call it nothing. You can't call anything what you want to call it. As soon as you name it it goes away. Or you grow it wrongly. Or it becomes what you called it. So. But I'd see her walking down Pender with her black hair and her body like a campfire and I'd spread dark wings in my room and think of her in a kind of oval like rippling pool. And I'd paint her with my finger on my stomach. Near my belly button I'd paint her. I'd drink. I'd drink. I could kill. I could kill. I could smile. I could smile. I could dance. I could dance. See. She. Listless. Temptress. Avelaval. Lavalavalia. Marisalalia. Water dripping on a leaf. A field of human bones. A world. Meetings with rawlegs and innocence at the library. Not near 85 pounds and fresh like morning flowers.

He was out with a friend at a bar on West Pender. It was halloween. There was merriment and costumes all about. And he sat there with a Scottish friend and thought about how it was possible to become such a nigger as he was. He told his friend what a nigger was. That it was something that had always been here. Something that had been around since existence birthed itself. It was a thing that was cold in the first explosion of that music of energies. Cold and burdened by its own cold and the streams of color from all that other light and matter began to suck themselves away from it and at the same time burned it colder. Until it poised itself in a perpetual emptiness, in a mirrored empty hellscape where not a thing would budge or even eek. Only it could dream, fantasize, it could dream wild dreams against the suns burning on their courses of indifference, and on the nights when its vantage sifted in to the deeps and it could see the scapes of starwork brimming in light, like God had cursed it to watch the great dance unfold from its cruel and dark world, it could see the whole thing falling down, down it's throat to wrestle with the thousand snakes it had created.
He stepped outside for a cigarette and before him was a man in a wheelchair wearing a hospital gown. It was bitter cold outside. The man begged him for help.

I need money for a taxi.
His phone wasn't working.
He went inside and got his friends phone. Through a sea of figures.
We have to get this guy a taxi.
Who?
The poor outside.
Alright.

They called him a taxi and paid the cab driver. Just take him back to the hospital. What the fuck is this guy doing here.
He sat for sometime and drank. Then he went to the bathroom. Then he kicked the toilet and cracked a piece of the top off and then he punched the wall until his hand started bleeding. Then he came out to see the arabs and the faggots drinking and the waitresses feared him and he took three whisky and took three more and tilted his head with his eyes all black and said to the bartender if you knew what is in my head you would never recover.

Then the night sang. On his way home every streetlight sang and doubled and doubled again. And the crones creaked by him with noxious eyes and broken hearts and his boots were untied and he passed a fire on the road and his life was passing by too, passing and passing every second and everything burned. He had a coffee at a small store and sat on a bench. Fat snowflakes fell. She came off the bus looking perfect. She worked and she worked, 6 days a week 10 hour shifts then the busride to work and home another hour and that was it.
You drunk?
Yes. You?
No.
Ok.
There was a city in the sky made of Gold. There was an island hidden in the fog where pale girls bodies smelt like roses. A missile was in his head. Black bones, he said. Black bones and charred hopes, and everything breaking.

Soft I thought about this machine I was certain I could create. A metaphysician, indeed. After getting milk and picking up the laundry and the toilet paper. Yes, seriousness confounds me. Yes, black daggers and strange dreams. I remember a certain affliction from seeking what was in the addicts out there on the street. In their hearts and in their eyes. We leave the haggard and the sick to be burned like puppies. Puppies with broken heads. We pour gasoline on them and set them on fire. We don't want to see them. We want to dance. And I remember how cold the night was that night. When I was drunk and I gave her my whisky and I wanted to have her. The body curled up at the corner of the bed. Her legs crossed and her hands by her side and her hair so thick and full. And my hand pulsing with pain. And the strippers in the dark where we went before. And the thousand addicts clinging to the lampposts before we came inside. The rain on the window. In the apartment building of the dead. Where sirens and knives move along the alleyside. Where the children speak to me: speak, speak back, they'd say. For your life is going away. Everyday, Everyday. Your life is going away. And I'd wear the colored feathers in my room. The feathered headdress for I was alone all nights unless I got a beauty to follow me sometime. So I'd put the feathered headdress on. And I'd birth myself in a mask. I'd lay down on the floor and breathe with my headdress on. And I'd put paint on my face and I'd dance. I'd see black spots in the air. I had a small picture I drew of a face with two spikes on either side and I'd tape it to the wall and put on the feathered headdress on and I'd try to become the face. The creature in the face that I could become. And I'd close my eyes and move all my energy into the top of my skull and I'd breathe and I'd breathe and I breathe the higher air.


Her body as white as the moon. And the bedroom door a little open and that hot slat of light that comes from another room, just lighting so softly across her chest in a pale blue. The almond eyes.

She comes from a different planet. A different world. He is not of any. He is teetering foundationless. She dresses up. Her lips have small cracks on the bottom. And the lips are red.

She sees the nigger boots at the door. She feels the nigger heart sometimes. She can see the truth of the man but does not know the feathered mask is under the bed. The truth? Slaking wolves in the woods. The cold wind cursing the leaves to gnash. The faun helpless. It has tripped. The mother turns then runs. The snow exploding. Intactile silence heave between the pawsteps of the hunters. The faun’s tongue is out. It wails and wails then goes silent. A meteorite threads and burns and dissolves into its final reckoning. The blood streams and falls onto the ground.

On another night he walked down Pender East and she was dressed like a child. Backpack, Pikachu toy dangling, a funny hat. They went under a scaffold of a construction building. The spiderlike shadows crossing them. On the street there was two police cars and a white sheet over something. Someone. She turned to him. He turned to her. But this was a different one. Slimmer, less full, more lovely, less in love. In his room he asked her. She said five years ago when she was twenty-five she had many boys. A Shinjuku boy, a Tokyo boy, an Osaka boy. She'd take the train after work across the mazes of Tokyo and into small apartments where she'd unroll herself and sink her teeth into the shoulders of skinny men that spent thier days coding or sober, alone, drawing ink-flowers. He thought he heard her say it. That word. But she couldn’t have. And his skin was white as bones. They'd go get cheeseburgers sometimes. Then play pool. Belly buttoned waitresses. Canadian girls with all the delirium and colloquial shit falling out there faces. Stussy one, Stussy two. Nigger who? Nigger you. He'd go alone and drink when she was busy. He wouldn't speak. He felt he would throw up if he got to know any of them. Because he could not tell them about the machine behind his eyes that was burning with violence and images, of grand sick objects leaving and entering his head like bats in a funhouse full of mirrors. Like closing your eyes to run with them out there in the forests in the snow, to drink the blood of the kill and snarl against the night and even the rain fears you when it touches your coat, even the stars tremble when you run, and the wind whispers to you and the gentle eyes of prey tremble when they see a shadow that is not you but of your entirety.

You want to go snowboarding?
Yes. I go. She smiles.
Ok.
You go?
No. How are a you waitress and have money to go snowboarding?
I save.
He looked at her.
Yes. And sometimes tips.
I buy too many cheeseburgers.
Yes, she said. Too many cheeseburgers. She smiles again.

Yes. Cheeseburgers. The falling power of her leaving. Then the machine comes in. Works with its fangs and leaks the poison. And intestate creature that seeks to come back for black revenge for the nothing it left and its immortality a debate. Cat dead. Cat alive. Cat dead. Cat alive. Black lead. Summer skies. Heaving breath and I could see through her skin the ribcage like a vision of acid heaven. I could see her lips looked black. I could smell the childish breath. Nato: The smell of garbage. The smell of her skin like lavender. Heal, nigger. Shut your sickness behind a door and bow before the houses of gold. They are building incredible things. Can't you see? World things made for the world. And you nigger? You are dripping down a rusty pipe, speaking to shades when the rain doesn't stop its ceasing. You are like a child of God. Yes. No. Where are you but lost in a world not like your own? Let's call her Zoa. And the other Salema.

They lost their colors like me.

He walked down a small laneway at night. With a small whisky bottle in his hand. He danced in the alley. He danced in the alley. There were bricks that were drinking too. The lamps were drinking too. He could see a spiderweb on a fan sticking out of a building. The spider was big and dark. There were flies in the web. He stood there for a long time and talked to himself about where he was going and what he was going to do. But he still could not remember anything. He could not remember what he was going to do.

She had left and he was alone. And he spent his days working at places he did not want to work at. He spent his time moiling over a vision of a life. Of a machine he could create in his mind that would open up the world. It would crack open the world he was in and he would become in that power and this world would become another one entire. His past steps would be annihilated. Everything he did would be cleared and annihilated. His own movements from then on would come from a whisper of where to go, and where not. What to say. And what not. Every idol would be destroyed as they are all destroyed everyday. Until there are none anymore. He would become the idol of himself and that self would be himself dissolved into others.

And so he worked on his machine. The machine to overcome everything. A machine to become a great visionary and the machines existence filled him with oddities beyond his comprehension. It began to work in him. Through him. As him. It began to show him signs of things. Growths of things. Images of things. Visions of people looking at him with tiny teeth covered in blood. Visions of great works not created and he would shutter at night until she told him ok I can meet you. I can meet you. We can meet at this place.
He sat there with her.
Are you ok tony?
Yes I'm ok.
The dark hair falling around her face.
Are you sure you're ok?
I'm ok. I'm ok. I just thought of something I should do.
What?
Nothing.
Can we drink more alcohol?
Yes.
I love alcohol.
I know. It's good.
She had a lot. And he took her home stumbling to his bed and lay her there and put the blanket over her.
She woke up. Where's my sister? Where's my sister?
You are just sleeping. You don't have a sister.
But where am I?
You're ok. Just sleep.
But I'm going home.
You're not going home.
I don't want to go home.
You're not going home.
I don't like home.

It happened again. And again. He couldn't finalize the machine. He wanted to but he couldn't. It was too difficult to understand. There was a figure in the machine so vastly intense and although it was his machine it seemed to have an intelligence of its own that could not be overcome. He couldn't return and answer to the figure to destroy it. He found the figure somewhere inside of himself and when he let him in he could not get him out. And he could not beat him. And he sat up in bed that night to discourse with vague oval shadows in the corner of his room. She was sleeping beside him. Naked and lovely, he put his hands to her chest. He squeezed her flesh. Then he let go and turned to the thing that was more so then anything.
Is it you? he said 
Who?
You know who.
It might be.
You are real.
I don't know. Who made me.
I did. But others have also?
Have you not seen me dancing? When you feel a rush. Is it not me who is dancing?
And you come from down the stairs.
Yes. I come from down the stairs. 
You are him, himself? 
I am many things. I come from many places. 
Do you regret it? Your act of defiance? 
No. Of course not. How could you regret anything if it shows you who you are.
But sometimes you make me want to weep. Because you believed in something. You believed that you could create another world. Then he took that away from you.


Yes, it said. Yes. In a darker tone. But you should keep trying. It is an admirable machine. And it speaks, of something, it speaks of where truth becomes lies, and truth is life, so life becomes spirit, and the spirit eats the mind, and the mind eats the heart, and the heart eats the truth, and when the heart eats the truth, it keeps beating, but it dies; and death can not be recovered. No matter how hard you try, when you have killed the heart you don't live anymore, you try, but you're not alive, because you've done something to yourself, and so you will do it to others, and the others will never love you, because you have killed the life that is more than your life. And then you have give yourself to me, and I work through you, and once you let me in, I can never come out. When you knock once, I don't answer. Knock twice, you won't hear me. But when you open the door and tell me to come in. I will never leave. Not in this life or the next. 



He woke her up in the morning. She looked at him oddly. Hey, he said. You're ok. She just lay there sleeping. Are you ok? You want to wake up. 
	No. I don't want to wake up. 
	He got up and stood in is tiny room with his head beating. He went to the tap and drank from it. He cupped the water in his hands and washed his face. 
	Do you want some water? 
	There was no answer. 
	Ok. I'll get you some water. 
	Ok, he heard her say. 
	He sat on the bed and tilted up her head and let her drink slowly. Then she fell dramatically back onto the pillow. Some more water for you.
	He grabbed her head again and tilted her up. 
	About 90 minutes later he woke her up. Hey, sweetheart. Little one. Maybe you want coffee? 
	Yes, he heard, muffled through the sheets. 
	You're ok for me to get you coffee. 
	Mhmm. 
	What if we go get coffee together. 
	She shook her head. 
	Come on. He turned on the light. Let's go get coffee. 


They went outside. China-town in the early morning. They walked down the alleyway and turned right and came into this fancy coffee shop. It was called Matchafriends or something. There was a girl working there and her name was Imogen or something like that. He loved her madly. She had blonde hair and blue eyes and he loved her more than anything in the world. He ordered two coffees and she was there working in the back. He felt like he would die sometimes when he spoke to her. He was 27 years old and he felt like dying because he loved women that he didn't even know. 
	Tony, she said. Tony I want water. 
	Ok. 
	They got the coffee and a glass of water. She drank the water then they went outside, in the autumn sun. Some leaves went across the road.
	So I'll see you again. 
	I think so. 
	You want to. 
	Yes. I want to. 
	Ok. 
	I can go. 
	No I'll walk you. It's ok. 
	They walked down Main St. past the American and past some homeless with carts and they past the Subway with Indian boys and the rain started to fall faintly and he wondered just what the world was when he could love someone that he didn't know, and want to love someone he was with, and there could be homeless and sandwich shops and the father of death itself was lingering over everyone like a shadow begging them to discover something they didn't know. And he hugged her. But he was a devil in his heart. He was a devil so he couldn't see her. He couldn't see any girl beacuse he wanted them all. And so he was a devil and this was a lie and his steps were a lie and his machine was a lie too. It was a lie to be alive and a lie to die. But he hugged her. And he thought maybe he could feel something that wasn;t just errant fear of being lost again. So he hugged her as if to love her. 
	Ok. I'll see you again. 
	Ok.
	He called the nigger friend. 
	Hey, nigger. 
	Hey nigger. 
	What're you doing?
	Having some pints. 
	Where?
	North Van. 
	I'm gonna have a panic attack. 
	Yeah. IT's all good. 
	Fuck it. The bar with the faggots and the fancy stuff. 
	Yeah, brownes. 
	Alright. 
	He walked to his truck and opened the door. 
	He screamed. 
	WHole thing smelling like acid. Dead smoke lingering everywhere. A junkie dressed like debutante was in the passenger seat. He kept screaming. She or he kept screaming too. 
	Get the fuck out of here. 
	Sorry, I'm sorry. 
	He watched he/her pick up all her wrappers and bullshit and then leave. 
	He sat in the truck. Thinking about where the cum stain might be. 



He got back to his apartment and ruffled through his drawers. There was about 12 dollars worth of a change. He went outside and went back to the shop and got another coffee. Then he walked up to the park and lay down and closed his eyes. He would speak to himself as if concoting a dissertation with no actual proof or origin or subject. Thing of history, he said That lived. I can't explain the reality of your inexistence. But I cannot believe or unbelieve. When 13 years ago I remember I was a child and a girl-child with eyes darker then the spaces between the stars I had captured in the fumes of an autumn night, and we we went alone behind the bushes in the park, in the lesser light of floodlights of the ice-rink which set the juniper berries to glow in the dark. Her body was not full. Her lips were purple from the cold. Her hair was tied back and two locks fell on each side of her face. In the park friends and enemies exchanged Roman Candles in an onslaught. I pulled her clothing off. Purple, red, blue, slid across her skin. Everything was there. Everything. Nothing else was need in life. And yet. You make us ache and fall. You give the answer but the Other whispers his poision into us. You let him. You let lost dogs starve by roadsides, you let trucklights scare them into the ditches and you let them whimper until no one saves them. You let the mind go into wards, you do not relieve them you let them obssess, you set the time for the sun to implode, you give us moments only to annihilate them then you take the whole thing. 

	He closed his eyes. He breathed. He could find something, somewhere. Out in the ocean where the ferryboats wander and the whales move through the dark.


He met his friend at the pub later in the night. He couldn't park his truck anyhere without a ticket coming. He floated around all of North Vancouver until he gave up. A nigger can't even park anymore, he said, to his friend when he arrived. A nigger can't even park anymore. 

	He ordered a pint. 
	I got booted from here last night. 
	What happened?
	I can't remember. 
	Good. Me either. 
	
	Later there were some others that joined them. Roth sat there with his head tilted feeling the booze going up and down his spine. There were some shouts. He opened his eyes. Scottish was telling the girl there something. It was quite clear. 
	First thing was: Shut the fuck up. Second: You're a cunt. 
	The boyfriend of the girl didn't do anything. Scottish was swinging his fists. She told Roth that he should find a new friend. Roth tilted his head and looked at her. What kind of friend? I've met everyone. Just find another like any other? 
	She didn't say anything. They were in there own world. As everyone is. The unlistening are everywhere. She had black hair and she was somewhat pretty. He was just thinking about his car and how many dollar store receipts he created and the little chinese girl at the bank with glasses who asked him again and again, was this for tools or to pay an employee.
	I have no employees. I find tools at garage sales. And I am a liar. 
	Sorry? 
	I am tired.
	You're tired. 
	Yes. So tired. 
	Are you nigger? I can see your bank balance. Are you a nigger?
	Yes. I am. Thank you for asking. My only refuge is listening to the rain. I've worn the same boots for a year. I spend my time working on a machine made of thoughts in a tiny apartment. I curse the heavens and the earth and my dreams religous.
	Back from that imaginistic fog to the simple reality of the bubbles moving up his pint glass. 
	Seen any sukis? 
	No. I'm seeing more hell in drop of water then a war over a million souls. 
	They went outside to smoke. HEll of earth, hell of time, aching for nothing. You are nowhere you ought to be. The slums of the east churn with the same stuff in your heart. Vicious characters, wrath of solitude. Hate for everyone. A brain dissolving from the futureless fog. A tunnel into the heart where no souls walk save you. He got in his truck then crawled into the passenger seat knowing that he could not drive. The Visitor: bitterness with sweetness. He whispered into Roth and showed him memories meshed with fictions, gaptoothed Northen Girls with racoon eyes, a long and black haired temptress from some foggy island with almond eyes, slender as a shadow, sitting by a fire, their pale skin burning white as the moon. His brain sifted down into them, mucous fell down their thighs, the rayon centres, blood-red lips gushed and trembled in the dark-light of the strange fire, soft river, soft eyes, the flowers on the banks opened to the moon, blackboats on the lake with lantern bearers watched from there cloaked fantasy, and then the adversary took over to rail into him genocidal fantasies, where the brain breaks and the body loses all control and he was gone into it entirely. Roth had dissapeared and it had come in. It had come over to see him. To occupy and say hello. And his right arm started to shake and goosebumps bloomed all over his body. He rolled down the window and puked up bile. He shivered and cursed the earth. He cursed everything and everyone. Latin chatterings in his brain stem. A black ooze betides me, ravens keep my secrets on the telephone wires, then fly their souls into flames. 
	Yes, it said. You have come to speak again. About the truth. 

	His phone rang. 
	Where the fuck did you go? 
	Huh?
	Where are you? 
	I'm in my truck. 
	Oh. Why?
	I don' know. I had to go. Something was coming to get me. 
	Come back out. 
	Alright. 
	See you soon nigger. 
	Were at the place across the street from the faggots.  
	Alright give me sometime. 


	This is not good he said. This is not good. With tears falling down his eyes. Whatever this is it is not good. It is not good. I am somewhere. I am somewhere else. I am not here anymore. I am gone.


He stumbled back in the rain to the pub. Blood seemed to be leaking out of peoples eyes. He sat and got a whisky with redbull. He thought about niggerdom. Perpetual niggerdom. Without a light and only a blacker-world coming. And his dreams there were none. This was his dream he just had not seen it. This was the curse he had given himself only to free himself from. But he could not see it. So he drank and the bells shot off from far away. Bells from some horrid place. Some place unknown. Later at night he was back in the squalered regions. Stting againt the bricks and speaking to the frigid and the wasted. A liturgy had commenced and Roth walked by it and looked inside to see the choir singing. And the cross glowing white. And the vagrants and the addicts sitting on the floor. All over 30 years, 40, some 50. They wept as the pastor stood solemn against the wall listening to the choir. He washed around and went into an Irish pub. Some looks from the waitressess. Some hell they don't know of. Some argument they have never heard in there heads. Of dark and light. Stranded. He drank his pint and did not speak. He paid and left to crawl back into his cavern and let the world sleep. 




Permit me my ending. Before it's too late. Then he had fallen again. In the breaks of the light between everything. He called out in the rain, why do you hate me. Why do you hate me? How can you hate me so much? How can you hate me like this. I'm just alone. I am just alone. No answer but the clouds thick hanging, covering the great vastness of everything. A silence like a spider on the wall before it bites. An untemple of earth, posing itself in an alleged existence, and all souls without souls go flowing through a great dream, casted in forms they had no choice being in, and wander you will alone until the end until the bells toll. 


Rain through the night. It kept falling down so strangely in the night. Roth could hear it coming through the window. He got up shaking and made himself a cup of tea and wrapped a blanket over himself. He went out and up the stairs to the communcal showers and put the screaming heat of water on his back. He lay down on the floor and closed his eyes with the water on him. He dried off and he went down the stairs. He put his on work clothes and got in his truck. 

	Fuck, he said. Cunt. Cunt and fuck. 
	He was in traffic. Uptown was quiet nice. If only he wasn't a nigger it would be even nicer. But he was a nigger. He turned into a road. 
	He got to a garage. 
	Hey. 
	Hello. 
	Were going all over hells creation today, said the boss Jud. 
	Nothing like being a nigger with a job. 
	Yeah. 
	He drank about 3 coffees from Tim Hortons just to get some juice from something. He could murder any one of these guys. It would not mean anything to him. They could all fall off a fucking cliff into a scorching fire and burn screaming forever. He got in the van. God dammit. This is it. Isn't it. Then back to the machine to force the world to kneel at my feet. Or, some other monster I could become. Blind slime. Drink tonight. Drink away. No where to go. Nothing to say. The world is stolen. It will be stolen again. It has been sent for you to die. At least it's not Wendy's, he said aloud. 
	At least were not working at fucking Wendy's. 
	The good man laughed. 
	And another thing, said Roth. 
	What?
	At least were not black. 
	The good man smiled. Yeah. That's true. Or fuckin' like women. 
	Yeah at least were not black women with cancer living a hole. 
	Yeah. Not bad. 
	What do you call a one-legged faggot failure with cancer?
	What?
	Terry Fox. 
	What do you call a half-price bentobox?
	What?
	Nagasaki. Full price is called the Hiroshima. How many Jews do you have to kill to make the world better?
	How many?
	All of them. 
	Why did God make black people? 
	Why?
	To remind white people what shit looks like. 
	If you were Jewish, and you wanted to kill a lot of people. What would you do?
	What?
	Make Israel. 
	If you wanted a Jew to suck farts out of your asshole how would you do it?
	How? 
	Tell them if they don't do it, you won't let them bite babies cocks off anymore. 
	Huh?
	I don't know. I was reaching for something. Another coffee nigger?
	Yeah buddy. 
	

Roth finished the day without saying goodbye. He took the bus home. He remembered if he wanted to speak to a woman, if they saw him in his workboots it was a 95% chance they'd say no. So he'd go to the pub. He played pool some nights until late. On the mondays and tuesdays when no one was in the place. He'd sit on the stool and watch the shit on the TV and then play until he could barely see then he'd pay without speaking. He wrote on the back of a piece of paper one night a hellful rendering and he saw when he left that the waitress was reading it. When he came back the next day she went bright red. He said hello and she couldn't speak. So he kept playing. A man came in. He said he came from Afghanistan and was living in the building next door. He said he met an Angel in Edmonton and she drove him to Vancouver and he never saw her again. He said Iblis was an intellectual. A stranger in the world, in his fathers house, and sensitive and cunning. But there was a condition of having everything that remainded sinister. There was nothing to become when your father was God, you could only make a false Kingdom, all that was given to you was the tools of destruction. For all that bumps in the night is a thing trying to usurp the laws of existence. 
	The man had bulging eyes. He looked more like an African. He asked him again. Where are you from? 
	I am from the middle-east. And you are a jew. 
	No. 
	Are you a jew?
	No. 
	Then what are you?
	I'm nothing. 
	You must be something. You must be a jew.  
	I'm nothing. 
	Don't pretend. I know you.  
	What the fuck did you just say nigger. Roth stepped up and the man saw the true murder in his eyes. An evil that would follow you home and slit your throat before torturing you. 
	Get the fuck out of here you muslim cunt. I'll gorge out your eyes and listen to you screaming as if it was music. Go pay the tab and never come in here again. Roth's right arm was shaking. He seemed to be in a completely different world.
	The man paid quickly and Roths eyes followed him out the door. 
	One of the girls came up to him and when he turned to look at her her head went down and then she walked away akwardly. He almost threw his glass against the wall. He went up to the bar and paid them. They saw his hands trembling. He muttered some bullshit to try to make them not scared. Then he went outside and thought if he could make that man scream, scream and bleed and walk like a starved dog in an empty world, in a desert with no sun, he would set him out there and forver let him freeze and bleed and no death not a death, only an emptiness forever. He would only talk to people like this. He would try to speak to the others. But it was always just shit coming out. There was no end at the bottom, no end, and the visions in the dark of his room piled on and piled on, and he saw wolves out in the dark behind his eyes, slinking through the trees, holy wolves invested in the truth alone, hunting for the laggard and the broken, to put them in a place they do not want to go. 


He woke up again for work. Then he heard that you could collect pretty easily and so he thought he just do that. Leech or nigger? He thought. Which is better? Leech or nigger? He went for another two weeks, a month. Some fucked-out old skateboarder with a broken back and an ego the size of downtown Cleaveland was telling him bullshit. He wanted to crack his skull into the cement and step on his head until the brains fell out. But he was too much of a pussy to do anything like that. He dreamed about other worlds. He dreamed of a small girl working in the coffee shop. Many of them. He dreamed of their small bodies and their pale skin and he dreamed so much he could not stop the dreaming. He dreamed of them calling him. Without fear. He dreamed of them all nights and he dreamed of one that he had but she was not a dream she was real, and that was something he could not understand. That she was real and his life was real. He could not understand this. That flesh could be so nimble. That time could ache and fade. That his coming was on the rise and his ending would annihilate everything. That his memory was true memory. But a great trick it could play, a fiddler was in the house, playing soft lies to withhold his true heart from becoming. 
	







Roth met a pale figure in a bar. Surrounding him was a general air of merriment which gave him a deep dispassion and almost a sickness. There were figures in the back. Like bats in caves inviting him into a different world entire. He walked up behind the pool table and grabbed a cue and sat beside the albino-figure. Whose hands were worn from years of work. Whose eyes bulged out and a scar ran across his bald head. Who the girls with their rawlegs would not come within a 4m radius of. Because of the conditions of his birth. Gentle creature between good and evil, he thought. Can you tell me about the truth of the world? 
	They played together and did not speak. Each stroke of the cue. He was in some ancient breath of a hobgolins shrewd intelligence, it played softly in the walls, softly in the walls the creatures from that other world sank into him through his beer and a pale faggot with painted eyes locked into him from across the room. He looked at him with violence and hate. And he stood as if an exercpt from a latin conjurers notebook, haunting that shadow textured nook of a pub on Main St. The albino spazzed. He looked over. There was rollergirl looking through the window with her tongue-out and her faketits. THe albino was screaming at her like a banshee. Roth never fled such places of conflict. It might've been his greatest art to let the cunts in there stussy watch him with his psychotics in the heat of passions. The backdoor was opened by a barman. The Albino fled without having to be let out. The owner looked at Roth. Decently dressed. Methless eyes. Roth shrugged. He watched the albino and rollergirl move down the road like children in love. 

Later that night his love came to see him. I working so long, she said. I so tired. Glasses. Slim. He liked taking her to places because just at the site of her the bartenders seemed pleased with him, and the waitressess voices went up to a higher octave. Danbo. I go soon. But I do not want to go. 
	It's ok. 
	She looked at him and he still could not feel anything. Because his receiving her and his work on her were all from the world of lies. Deception shows the hidden world. The occupant of the wrong steps is only who it is revealed to. All others will never see it. They sat at the bar. Her hands ran up and down his legs. Up and down. He was always in a state of deviousness. There was nothing in his head that was pure anymore. It was all written in blood. All of it was insanity. Every moment was a gathering of subtle deceptions or a fountain of pain. Even the room could take on an identity. Even the pint-glasses were of a arrogant form, speaking of some rotten thing. Even a garden, even a park, a stone held cunning, a rock was manipulating the truth. The rain was a liar as it nipped his neck. All was against the true host. The creator of the machine. The one who was usurped from the throne. He held his hands on his head, as if to shake it out. 
	What. What's wrong? she said. 
	His hands covering his face. She took them down. His eyes were watering. 
	What is it?
	I can't tell you. 	
	What's going on? 
	Nothing. 
	They walked back down the alley and into his apartment. They lay down in the dark. 
	Can you tell me? she said. 
	No it's ok. 
	Just tell me. The white skin so white in the acid light of the room. Her body slender and lovely. Her hair like a crown of ink as he came over her. 
	What is it? You ok? 
	I am a monster. 
	She smiled. 
	Monstah?
	Yes. But a real one. A real monster. I can't feel anything. I can't feel anything or anyone. It's all gone. It's all lost. 
	But you were crying. 
	No. 
	It's ok. You were crying. 
	I'm a monster. 
	Ok. She smiled. Ok. You are a monstah. 
	One rose had come. There had been no roses for years and he felt one. 
	He smiled. 
	Yes. I am a monster. 
	Come here monstah. Come here. You want to be a monstah. 
	She got up from the bed and grabbed the tiny-baby-glassess he had bought from a dollar store. He kept them in the sock drawer and brought them out for alien sexual eroticism.
	She put them on and moved across the bed. She got to her knees and went right up to the wall. She put her nails on the wall and start scratching the paint. She looked at him. 
	Oh no, she said softly. Help. He a monstah not a man. Help me pwease. I'm dying. I'm dying. He gon kill me. He grabbed her arm and pulled her down. 
	But really. It's really bad. If you came inside my head. You wouldn't recover. You would not come back. 
	It's ok. 
	No. It isn't. 
	Well then fix it. 
	I tried. 
	Then just come to me. She grabbed him. Just come sleep. Just come to bed. 
	
	Nattie was her name. From outside of Tokyo. She worked in a ramen resteraunt on West Pender. On the corner on the opposite side of the street of the Church. He went in there one day. She looked small. And very pretty. He needed to do something unusual so when she came to him Roth said give me two beers. 
	You don't want food?
	No. 
	One beer? 
	No give me two beers. 
	She didn't know what to say. 
	Just put two bottles of beer in front of me please. 
	Ok. 
	When she came back around he said he'd meet her at a coffee shop. 
	

They met in the beautiful summer. He could barely afford anything. He bought her a cappucino and he had one too. Then they walked down to Water St. to look out at the ocean. He couldn't see anything about life. He couldn't see anything at all. He could just see what he wanted and nothing else. And everything was bland and the enemy of his soul. And she was not a reality. Just a thing to play with. And that was what tortured him, but he could not stop it. For he'd seen others like this. And did not yet know they were liars, and sufferers and terrors and hid there weeping and there howls from the social world. And they felt nothing but getting what they wanted, and what they wanted was of no importance. That the world is a house of blind slime ever faking themselves into more non-sense is something he could not understand.

	He kissed her to get her and not to feel her. On the side of the bricks. He kissed her to have her and not for anything else. 
	I rike kissing you, she said. 
	Nigger it said. Deviant nigger your life is one sick story to the next. 

That night she came back to his place. He asked her what it was like. What it was like. She said I don't know what you mean. What it is like when you're gone from it. He came close to her. What does it feel like when your eyes go back into your skull.  She said she didn't know. That it was just a feeling. That it didn't really matter. That it was just there then it was gone and it didn't really matter. He remembered her poised in a sauna house on Hastings. Her skin the color of honey in the light of the room. Her small frame as she held her arms around her shins and the ribcage and the bumps of her spine sticking out. He remembered he was having visions that day. More so then other days. The images were like black wings of birds, but almost like curtains, crowding him, like portents of some horrible meeting with something. And he would speak to her but then he would stop. And then he'd do something to make her laugh. And then he'd think if the devil was a color what color would he be. Blue, he said, aloud. Cold and blue and with black-wings of birds flowing through his eyes. 
	What you say? Blue?
	Nothing.
	She looked down at her toes in pink flower socks. 
	The night was cold. He walked her to the Chinatown station. He asked her for Japanese words. She said tick tick was a man walking slowly. Sta-Sta was a busy man on his way to somewhere important. Roth's spine started to shiver. He was so angry he couldn't speak. He got her to the steps as best he could without showing himself. He said goodbye and they kissed. 
	You'll see me again. 
	Yes. 
	He always asked twice. Because he was afraid. 
	Yes I will. 
	And he walked home like a starved soul wanting to cut his skin off, to take his heart out and leave it somewhere under a bridge, where the birds and the dogs would sniff but not eat it. Only the bugs would take it with heartfelt discontent. 

	In the china-town park crews of addicts would spend there night in circles huddling together. They looked like castaway wanderers searching for some religion they could not find. A place that existed on an internal path. So they only moved together, from street to street. And came back to discourse with each other on this place that lived on a perpetual horizon. In the day there were joggers, dog-walkers. Everything was as usual. Only the killer was in his heart and no one elses. The killer with a world that was only his own. He walked along the halls in his head. One night, two nights. A million more. Then dead. In the park a junkies dog got loose from its leash and it ran then it jumped near the centre it was flying and the wind came and the autumn leaves fell with it. 

He saw the nigger one day. A real one drinking by the garbage fire on the side of the road. He went to him. Sit down, young blood. 
	Roth sat on a small bucket.
	I bet your about the dumbest motherfucker on earth. 
	Why's that?
	You like this shit. That's why. You could probably fall into a rich mans pocket just from shaking hands and get some blonde girl that likes shiny things to suck your dick. But you'd rather rail against nothing. And fill up with liqour. 
	Nigger is a nigger does. 
	There he is. Rotten to the core. And no way out. Rotten to the core. 
	And the alternative, said Roth. Zara, some mouth-breather with a pretty face: brain like a tub of shit, condominium, a shiny watch, speak to jews, talk to faggots, discuss the bottle, stomp the weak, ending up killing a jew with a switchblade in the pale moonlight. 
	That doesn't sound so fucking bad. You think that's bad. That's a good life. 
	No. 
	Why? 
	I'd rather just lay in park until things get worse. 
	Shit, man. You ain't stupid. You're a killer. You aren't stupid, no. You're evil or something. Laying in the park isn't laying the park. It's something else. You don't lay down without thinking about a knife and a pussy.  
	Nigger, I got to go. 
	See you blood. Remember. The world was made by the devil. And women were too. 
	I always knew the second part was true. I think I'm starting to understand the first part too. 
	How old are you? 
	Nigger. What does an age matter? What does an age matter to a nigger like you? 
	See you buddy. 
	That was a lean man that lived near the hastings and carrol. Roth thought for some reason that every day was that man's last day. Something in his eyes that said that this was it. And every conversation was like this. The first time Roth met him he looked right into his eyes and Roth said hey nigger. And that was it. They were friends. 

Well he had nothing to do. He left his job and the government was sending him checks for no reason. Then he'd skeemed a little illegal work. He'd take some off the top of guys that he sent to job sites. So he could work on his machine. And some days he just felt like half a faggot. And he hated talking. He hated looking at people. Somedays he knew he was insane and that made him laugh. Alone. He liked this girl Stella he had made. She had dark hair and could compose strange melodies but she found her sister one day in Northern Ontario raped and broken in the trees. And across the river there were figures watching. Not men and not wolves but shadow things. Like they came from somewhere else. So she moved with her sister to Vancouver. And her sister was beautiful. And she was too but her eyes were darkk and scary. And she sold coke around the town and carried a small pistol in her boots. Some nights he'd go out with a small audio recorder and ask the addicts questions. What happened. Where are you. What was it. Where did it come from. Do you hate it. Do you hate the world, like me. Then he'd listen to his recordings and fit them into his machine with Stella like the centre piece of some monster. And he thought he could make something more real than reality. He thought his machine could be more real than this world. More real than rain and the snow. More real than the blood in his bones. And that was when it came in. And started to speak. And Stella he would create for hours. Her body pale and slender. He would send her down halls with the pistol in her hand and she would see her sister through a window of some cocktail bar with red lips sipping something. And then she would shake, her right arm would start to shake, and her strange melodies became the energies of malevolence and cunning. And she would see her sister on an alter stone with blood streaming down the sides and priests in dark robes ascending a spiral staircase. And haruspices reading the entrails while her sister's lips mouth ed strange love to her. And her sister would run through the dark world. And see things. And speak to things....
	
	Well. Hello Irish-girl with blue eyes. You have just moved in. You have given me a printer that I did not need. 

	Black blood, he said. Black blood. Dripping... Down a dark leaf. She knocked on his door that night as he worked on the machine. His heart was going to explode just from the terror of the light coming through the window. He opened. 
	Hey. 
	Hi. 
	Do you have any sugar?
	What?
	Or flour. 
	Which one?
	Do you...any...do you have any?
	Yes. 
	He just looked at her. 
	Well. Can I have some?
	Sugar. I can give you sugar. 
	Ok. 
	He went to his cupboard and got the sugar and cam back and handed it to her.  
	So we'll go to the pub tonight. 
	Which pub?
	I don't know the name. Of anything actually. Or any place. I just walk in. 
	Is it like...um
	It's like a pub. It smells like piss and they have alcohol. 
	Oh, umm, Im not sure I want go. 
	Come on. I'm kidding. It's nice. I'll come get you at your room. 
	Ok. 
	Ok.
	Well when?
	I don't know times. But you will know when I knock. 
	You're a bit weird. 
	Yeah. Sure. Fucking weirder then an 8 pound doorknob. 
	What?
	See you. 
	Well I'll get your phone number. 
	No. I'll just come get you.
	But..
	Good. See you soon. I need to fix my machine.  
	He smiled and shut the door. 
	
Where is the devil. If he's not in every word that comes out of your mouth. 

	Black night and cold. They went through the alleyway. He could smell her shampoo. Stange black distortions aura'd her pale face and licked her coat. Her eyes irish-blue. He was trembling like a starved dog for flesh. She spoke. He did not hear. They went down to a pub on Main, past the glowing windows of the Irish place on the corner, into a darkly lit dive with a little man behind the bar who was the owner. Roth was in the grips of the machine. It had taken over. He stuttered. His blood was pouding in his temple. They sat in the corner near the back. He saw some faggots and some niggers but he didn't say anything. She smiled, she tilted her head and her hair fell softly. Some strands floated on the top of her drink. She pulled them away and laughed. He confessed his insanity. Somewhat. He left out the visions so he would not scare her. He told her that he was a disease. He told her that as soon as you see a snowflake it ceases to exist. That the wolves hunting beyond man's sight is where the world is. Where they run under the stars where no eyes can see they have yet to be distinguished from everything. That her eyes were lost to him as soon as he looked at them. That you cannot see the world because you create it. That the world is stolen by our eyes and taken from us the second we conceive of it. That a storm is not a storm. And stone is not stone either. He felt black snakes tangling in his stomach. Was that the name of them, or the name he'd given them. The serpent birthing in that seperate womb. You got a niggers heart, that's your problem. That's your problem. You got a niggers heart. And it ain't easy to get rid of. Cursed yourself. Cover yourself in ash and beg like a whore by the ganges. She grabbed his coat and pulled him in. A lobe of saliva fall down her bottom lip as she brushed it away. He said I'm a killer you know. As her lips filmed in warm saliva shimmered in the light of the bar. 

	They walked back and he toddled. They went into her apartment. Everything was clean. She had curtains that were blue. She had cups and a place to dry off her dishes. She had a plant. 
	He wanted to cry.  
	What?
	The stuff. 
	In the dark she told him about fantasies. About an older couple tying her up and she liked and didn't like it. He was a professor. She was a slut. Another one, she was taken by aliens into a craft and tied down onto a metal dish and they put a machine down her throat as she trembled. They read her pleasure centres on giant screens. 
	And the last one, he said. 
	I can't tell you. 
	Why?
	I can't tell you. 
	What is it?
	No no no. I can't tell you. I can't tell anyone. It's too much. And if you told anyone. 
	They would never recover. 
	Hmm?
	It would ruin thanksgiving dinner. 
	She laughed. Yes. 
	He saw her at a palestine march. Wide eyed like a faun following some urge to involve herself with the misery of the world. He went up to her apartment one day in a fugue and asked her if she would be with him. And he could work on his machine in the dark and she could be like a house cat and make him tea. She didn't want to. He was her little pet for a night and that was it. He went alone that night and took the bus to the ocean. He went into a bar where everyone was in celebration. He had no money again and he looked at his bank account and it said $200 and rent was coming and he closed his eyes and breathed and the waitress said hello.
	He tilted his head up to the sky. Fuck it. 
	He got whisky and beer until he had $50 dollars left. Then he lay on the beach and counted the drowning stars and listened to the soft wailing of the waves. This is where the dogs will meet me. This is where they come to huddle together before they go out to the dirty areas and slake for souls a little closer to the truth then me. This is where a nigger would die. Freezing solid on the beach. This is where a nigger like me would end his life. 


	He saw a young girl with black hair on the beach. Ghost-like. He looked over. His head burning. Stella, he said. Stella. Her body was burning like the moon, god of heaven slats of shadow and light painted her as she moved out to the water. Her soft throat like a seabird, the seakelp sliding around her legs. Vision of heaven. He fell back to the earth. Too scared to go to her. He looked up the clouds, trembling and unfolding, moving and trembling, opening and closing, a breaking light, an openin flower.






He went looking for her on Hastings the next day. He wore his only black raincoat. He got single cigarettes from the guy in the wheelchair on the corner and then he walked down the street. He knew what the image of her was. And that he was certain he had met her before, and certain she was the exact replica that he had given birth to in his machine. He  was watching them on the street. Sucking on plastic tubes and filling up their lungs. It smelt like windex and acidic hells. He went into the library on the corner. There was a drumcircle commencing. The sound of the cries of some region of history that bellowed out the hot communion of truth of his heart and the world. Of all hearts and the whole world. Where down black rivers they would run through the night with knives created by their enemies, hounding to seek the machinelike men that composed things in ink and not in blood. And in his then head the images came in rages and raptures. Dark birds scraping through a sky that was violent in its own nature. The air like screaming blood and they carved through and bombed down the immortal horzions, and his neck heaved with a fake heaven, and she came to him, the girl that he had met and had seen in her yellow raincoat on a bus. She came dripping with blue mucous, covering her skin and her eyes as black as the holes in the sky. And he walked out holding his head and the rain fell hard against his coat. He sat and calmed down. He stood up. He shivered. He talked to himself.
	At night he sat there alone and again spoke as he had spoken to the untruth of the world. What its powers were. That its existence was so. See it clearly: whispering to the inferior form to allow him to create a machine more real than reality. Begging him. On his knees. On his knees and weeping. Give me the tools to create a distort in the entireity of the world. Let me make the rain fall up. Let me have them. And when I have them let there be blood. And he called upon a devi. When he worked upon his machine he would call the devi to him and it would cosume him and his eyes had never been so black. Bleed he said. Bleed devi. And I will drink. And your blood will create this. I will do nothing. Bleed. Bleed for me. Killer he heard in the walls. He heard in the halls and he heard it everywhere. Killer, it said. Killer. I will make the rain make you sick. I will make you shutter and stutter. I will fill you with strange desire and your machine will swallow you whole. 
	Roth, a low voice. From somewhere. Roth. 
	
And he got out of his apartment and he walked down the road. He could not find her. Stella. Black hair and blue eyes. Perfect. Lovelocks falling  the smell of jackpines in the summer breeze. You wear the silk of spider. You eat my terrored dreams. He bought some drugs for $5 then he went to the testing centre to see what it was. They said they would check it then send him and email. He said I'll just wait. He looked out there for her. He talked to a man that was in the cusp of some outrageous adversary. You seen ricky?
	No. 
	You seen ricky? Tell him it's john. 
	John. I don't know where ricky is. 
	If you see him. Tell him Ricky said hello. 
	You're John. You're looking for ricky. 
	I don't know a ricky. 
	Fucking hell man. 

	He went and sat at a diner next door. He had eggs and bacon and a black coffee. He texted a friend but there was no answer. He headed down to the pub. There were faggots and  niggers inside. One had a mushroom hat or something on his head. The other was just a nigger. A plain nigger. A Jewish faggot came out of the bathroom. Roth got a beer. The women working there didn't like him. They wanted a monkey. Bash the cymbals. Make me smile and laugh. War in a month. In a year. In a year he'd be in the end of this. In a year.  He drank. He thought this street looked like a movie set with the old signs of hotels. The straight road like a Western. The only thing strange was the glass window shops with the plants and the matcha. It had the creatures that you could speak to it as if from hell or some adjacent circle. It had the busses that snapped electric sparks and it had the steady falling of rain. And it had Stella in it. Stella was in it somewhere. Somewhere...where the vision would end and the truth would breach. Of an unfathomable thing making it's presence and saying I am a living thing. Where he could find it. Somewhere. Where he had...in a spell through the bricks at work. The unconciencable clarity of the face staring at him with terror and love and his heart rate exploding and  he threw up behind a shed and fell to his knees and buried the bile beneath the sand. Deus mysterium. Stella soft like a love cat. Ragged and pale. A figure turned a corner. A girl. He moved across the street to follow her. What would he say if it was her. What would he say if it wasn't. But just to see her, just to see her. Avelaval. The streetlamps like giant mechanical flowers. He turned the corner...what would it say? What it would be. God of heaven you are here. 
	She got into a car. The passenger seat. 
	He memorized the license plate and quickly put it on his phone.
	He breathed. He went back into the clinic and got the papers. 
	He read them inside the pub. 
	Pyschomimetics. An hour of bats. Or just his head, amplified. He crumpled and put in his pocket. 

	

















He met her at a nice Italian resteraunt. She was wearing a beautiful dress and had a black bag that looked expensive. Her hair was so dark. The server had a tattoo of Shiva on her arm. He told her what it was. She seemed to not care. He wanted to keep talking but then he stopped. They ate spaghetti and meatballs. He wanted to talk to her about his machine. That he had seen someone that he had created inside the machine. That he would see things sometimes. His whole head would fill up with these things. Images. He asked her softly. 
	Do you have a lot of dreams?
	Not really. 
	What are the dreams like when you have them?
	I don't know. 
	Do you ever see things when you're not dreaming?
	Like what?
	Like thoughts. That turn into images?
	Sometimes. 
	Like what?
	I don't know. I don't think about it. 
	Do you ever hear anything?
	No. 
	Ever?
	Never. 
	Ok. 
	They ate. He had a beer. They went down to the stripclub. There were rats skampering down the brick walls. The lights let out a purplish hue. He held her hand because they were in that area. Vague eyes looked up and down her body from the shadows. Her blood-red lips were like darkened apples. Tony I'm scared. 
	We're almost there. 
	When they got inside they sat in a booth. 
	She seemed dumbfounded.
	They don't have anything like this where I'm from. 
	Really?
	Yes. 
	A girl with skin like leather and a body like something you'd put on a hook to catch a fish came up. 
	Hey sweety. 
	Yuna's hand gripped his leg. 
	Hi, said Roth. 
	Would you like a drink. 
	Budweiser. 
	Ok. And you sweety?
	She couldn't speak. She looked at Roth.  
	Two. 
	Aren't you going to say please?
	Please. 
	She walked away. 
	Oh Vancouver. Let the rain never stop till it washes away. 
	She was drunk and grabbing his leg. He felt a violence boiling up. He drank. He felt it again and it was burning him. He looked around to see if there was anyone that would come to his table if he left. There wasn't. 
	I'll be back in one minute, ok?
	Ok. 	
	He got up and walked down the hall to the bathroom. When he got in he locked the stall door and sat with his head pounding. A rain of thoughts sucked him in and he squeezed his fists together. He was quite sure he would pass out. He said no. No. Starved dogs. Children with holes in there heads. The sick wandering  through all the streets of the world. You will not. I will never. No matter what. NO matter what. You cannot be it. You are a killer yourself. You are the killer. 
	He washed his face. He looked at himself. Twenty-Seven years old and scaling down the path to until he did not know what. Charred suns and stars, the rain will take all of this away.  
	They sat in that plastic paradise as the music blared and he only thought the drink would cheer him up. Then she slid her hand between his legs. 
	He looked at her. 
	I just want know if...
	If what...
	Nothing...
	Nothing?
	No. 
	Ok. 
	The lights of purples and reds pooling and flowing across her face. Fading and coming, a neon picture. His head spinning out of hell, into a fire from some other place. Her drunk and fat tongue filled up his ear and his arm started to shake.  On the banks of the ocean in the cold on the grass he felt her body shiver and  the few stars out there pulsed blue. The ferrry boat lights were blinking and a soft wind blew. He told her it was his. That it belonged to him. As her eyes fell back like a beggar. A flashlight appeared form far off across the beach. A soft rain was seen in its light. Tony, she said. Tony. 
	We have to go. 
	They walked back through the muck of addicts. Drunk out of there skulls and Roth dreaded that rath of which he occupied. Which he opened her up to. The creak of the door. Black magik cloaks the walls. Tony, she said. Tony, I don't like it here.  I hate it in this room. 



He woke while she was sleeping. He got out of bed and quietly moved to the kitchen. He turned on the kettle then he shut the bedroom door. He went over and opened up his machine. He moved to a place where Stella was seen. Stella was beside an old barn and the moon was coming through the slats of the decaying boards and she walked through shadow and light, shadow and light, ashen skin. She opened the door and there were Animals breathing in the dark. Large forms with heartbeats in the dark and their breath coiling in helices then dissappearing. And the sound of them breathing. All in union. He looked at another part of his machine. Stella lost in the rain on small trail in the forest. A wolf came out of the skeltering slash of wind and rain.  Mangy and sick. Nearing death. It looked at her. Then it turned its head and stuck its teeth into its belly and ripped itself. The blood fell like rain.  It toddled down the road and then fell. She moved towards it. Watching its body breathing rapidly. She knelt beside it and it went to snap but it couldn't. Only its eyes staring back at her. With a violence and a sadness. And she placed her hand on its coat and the rain did not let up. And she closed her eyes so she could see it, running through the night, with no distinction from the world, for no words it had to name things. Where it ran was what it was. It moved through itself and it ate itself, and it died into itself and ran headstrong against its own constraints, to kill what it was, and to die was only to take a different form of what it already was. He remembered himself up North when he was young. He was walking back home in the fall  and a dark form was coming towards him. He stopped. A black horse came out of the darkness. As it passed he could see the rib cage sticking out of the skin. And the legs thin and the head weakly kept up. On its coat large wounds of some parasite had opened it up and the bugs were flitting and feeding on it as moved lost, to nowhere, yet it would not fall. This one would not fall. 
	She came out of the bedroom. Dazed and hungover. 
	Hi. 
	Can have some water?
	Yes. 
	He filled up a mug with tap water and gave it to her. 
	Is ok?
	Huh?
	She pointed to the tap. 
	Yes. 
	He closed the machine. 
	The kettle started to sound. He made a cup of tea. 
	Do you want some tea?
	No. I don't want. 
	Wow. Amazing.
	Huh?
	Just amazing that people like different things.Wow. 
	I don't understand. 
	Nevermind. 
	Tony, thanks. 	
	For what. 
	For taking me. 
	Oh, sure. Did you like it?
	A little bit. 
	A little bit?
	I liked. 
	Well well. He flicked up his eyebrows and curled an imaginary moustache. Well well. Looky looky. 
	I want to go home. 
	Ok. 
	But I want to sleep also. 
	Go sleep then go home. 
	Ok. 
	Do you even know me?
	What?
	I don't think you know me. You don't know anything at all. You're just a nigger. A poor nigger with nothing. 
	The bedroom door was closed. She is sleeping. You heard nothing.
	He walked her to the bus station. She had moved apartments. He talked about how pretty she was. He said her body was perfect. He said he wanted her all the time. He told her he would kill anyone to have it again. She looked, smiling. That he would take a hammer and bash peoples skulls in if they talked her. He would bash their heads into bricks and paint himself with their blood and run around the city screaming Yuna is mine. Yuna is mine. She kissed him on the cheek. Tony. Next time just alcohol. 
	No ladies?
	No. 
	Just alcohol. Ughhh. I have to work so many days now. My momma call me, say it right?
	Yes, good. 
	My momma call me and she say she want me go back home. 
	What did you say?
	No. 
	Is she alone?
	Yes. 
	What does she do?
	She watch drama and drink alcohol. 
	Well. I think she's alright then. 
	Ha. Good. 
	You don't like home?
	I hate home.
	The bus arrived. 
	Bye Tony. 
	Bye. 


It was 11 am on Saturday. He got some cash out of the ATM and went for a pint. He sat. Beside him: 1990s Maple Leafs jacket. Leather sleeves, faded blue all else. Black toque slightly up over one eyebrow, floppy. One wallet on the bartop. The other wallet in his hand. 
	Huh?
	I didn't say anything. 
	Oh. Well fancy fancy. 
	Roth smiled. 
	Sharlene can you get me soem of those chips. 
	It's Marla. And which ones?
	Any ones. 
	She went to grab them.
	No not those ones. The doritos. 
	You're grinding me down Marky. 
	I'd grind you down in the bathroom if only you'd let me. 
	Chips were put on the table. 
	What you do son?
	Collect. And illegals. 
	Hey. That's shit. 
	Yes. 
	Fucking shit. 
	Alright. 
	Worked for 35 years logging up there. 
	Oh yeah. 
	Yeah.  
	Best years of my life. Saw as many things as I could. He drank and his beer fell down his chin. He wiped it off on his sleeve. He couldn't get the chips open. He put the on the ground and stomped. Loud pop. He picked them up. Fucking not bad. 
	He ate. 
	They talked for a little while. Roth was buzzing. The man told him a story and was handing him scraps of something. When Roth looked down he had ripped receipts and some candies in his hand. 
	What the fuck is this?
	The man laughed. Careful fella. I know you. I've been you. Careful. 
	He put a $50 dollar bill on the table. Marlene, Marlene, please don't take him even though you can. 
	It's Marla. 
	Darling. It's Christmas. Saddle up. 
	The figure left. 
	





Come out of the corn did yea? To save yourself from what? Truth is you are in and out of the corn at all the times. May be there ain't even a corn field. May be you weren't ever lost. There wasn't any every going or coming  or finding. You were just told there was. By who? It lives in all men's hearts. It wants to feed on you. It doesn't come from the men who propose it comes from the same thing that is in all men. That other ripper of things destined. Undestined it works. To undo you is its dream. And what is that? The billion years of cell to man. The fools. Can't even look at the clouds without wondering why. Wonder don't need a next step. Don't need anything. Just is. Just be. 
	 
	
	




Then the rain kept falling. It just wouldn't stop. He could feel nipping at his neck. And the heart was there. And his head was home. 


The next day he went down Hastings looking for her. He avoided Ol' Rickety, as he called him. His landlord that had a gammy leg. Hobbled down the alley like a portent of Roth's coming doom. I go that way he goes the other. I'm trying to make a machine to overcome the world. And this faggot has kids and a disease. Ahh shit. 
	Roth, he said. 
	Roth kept walking.
	Hey. I know you can here me man. 
	Roth stopped. 
	Listen man your always missing your rent. 
	Yeah. 
	Yeah?
	Yes. 
	Yes?
	So. What's next cowboy. 
	Motherfucker what's with the attitude. 
	There is none. I think you might be smelling something on your clothes. 
	you know I've never met someone so arrogant. 
	Look. I don't have it. I'm sick. I'm sick. Alright. So what do you want?
	The rent you idiot. 
	Alright. Give me a couple days. 
	You better have it. I get comission if all the rents on time. 
	Ah fuck. Roth scratched his head. Alright. Alright. I apologize. 
	No you don't. But just get it bro. 
	Ok. 
	 He headed down to money-mart and he rinsed the place clean. Then he paid and then he just lay down in the park and thought about his machine. I wore the fur of my brother and recieved the blessing of my dying father. Now I walk waiting for the heavens to open. If i can tilt the foundation so much will it show me? Will it show me the true world. The lies sink you down until the light pulses. The blood gets thicker till the the other blood pulses through. 



Shit. Is that Roth?
	Huh?
	Old aquaintance from the high steeps of the Easten Social Order. 
	Oh, hey. How you doing?
	Good bro. Just heading down to Florida. What of you been doing?
	Just wandering acheron. Looking for pussy. 
	Cool, said the acquiantance. In heartfelt discontent. 
	And you live here. 
	Yeah. Just down the street. What are you doing here?
	Here for a couple days then I'm gone. 
	Good man. Yeah I'm just a nigger. 
	Huh?
	Just off to the library to find some japo-feminine innoncence to drip the poison of love into her ears. 
	The guy smiled. What?
	Yeah I dress up and I go the library. Open the computer. Put on glasses. 
	Get the fuck out of here. 
	Yeah it's like 20 - 30 % return. So if I go three times a week I can get at least one good nights sleep a week. 
	Fucking hell that's crazy. 
	Yep. 
	Life is full of suprises. 
	
	


When he got back to his apartment he worked on his machine. He tried to size out and modify this occupant in his head. What were his properties and intentions. He arrogantly supposed that it was more complex then the truth of it. He created figures and left himself while working to see if the hand that worked would lose itself from his mind and the strings of the puppateer would empty the truth into the machine. He searched for hidden relations, by candlelight. He closed his eyes and breathed and scoured and cursed hmself. He scratched many stones but they would not bleed. He attempted to bridge 6, 7, worlds. He exctracted the the perfumes of memory and allotted them into supposed reasons. He birthed an innocent child then slit her throat. He fought against a shadow in the corner of his room. Sometimes he spoke to it. Sometimes it spoke to him. He'd get up and go out the convenience store in the middle of the night. 
	Hey, the worker said. Number one bullshit guy. 
	Hey. 
	What are you doing?
	Nothing. He tried to have fun with him. But he hated him. He hated him so much. But he was alone and he was afraid of his thoughts and his heart. 



	Roth Davies set out to meet his friend at the pub. Finny, good sir. How are ya?
	Good mate. 
	What's up?
	He fucked my girlfriend. 
	What?
	Yeah.  
	No. 
	Yeah. 
	The liqour kept coming. They were on Granville. Everything was fucked in his head and his friends head was 3x if not more fucked. Strange powders had invited him into there gracious hold. He skunked up in a bathroom. He came out like an angel of energy. He spoke with a delirious articulation. Then 22 minutes later he was incapable of looking anyone in the eye. I think I got to go. 
	Just relax man. 
	No it's so fucked. It's so fucked. I've tried. I've tried to explain. No one is in the land of the spirit. Misery turned to symbols. A black brain and the mother eating the young. The blood is not blood it's something else. 
	Ok ok go home go home. 


	He was sitting with some fellas. 
	The girl I'm seeing has cancer. 
	What?
	Yeah she just came over and filled up the place with cups and plates and that. Got me a microwave. 
	I guess you don't need plates when you're dead. 
	Fuck mate.	
	What kind of cancer?
	I don't know. Bad one. Got three months or something. 
	Shit, said Roth. 
	Well, said Scottish. At least she's not black. 
	Laughter everywhere. 
	Waitress came up. 
	Hey, she took the order. Typical cunt princess of Vancouver.  She left. 
	Fuckin weird cunt. 
	That's fuckin everyone here. 
	There jus' like livin' there best life. Just like ya. Just like ya ya ya ya ya ya. Good for you, ya. mhmm. ya. Tapas, do you like tapas? Do you like my balls in your mouth? I think I know something better than tapas. A bowl of milk in my basement and no sunlight for 3 years. 
	Faces go strange with mirth when Roth steps up for a go. 
	You're one sick puppy. 
	Roth took down his whiksy. 
	You have no idea.
	You have rape ideas. 
	One thing is for sure. We are all not black. So let's drink and be happy.  
	


	
	
	He moved outside. Fuck. Rain. Fuck. Life. Everything spinning. Killer in your heart. Killer in your heart. 
	
	
	
	
		


Those were the nights the rain became his own. When he left himself and entriely and the occupant moved him. The ecstasy of it drowned him. Everything took on a clarity of intensity. It swept him in and he heard the elvish chattering working in his head. He found her sleeping in the alleyway. His heart going like mad, he reached out to touch her. She turned and he saw the face of an old woman. Scarred on her upper lip and the skin so awful. He walked away. His left arm shaking. Hot sick visitors came to roll up his eyes and he fell to the earth. His stomach screaming. This tangled manchild, the sick hands do this sick work. The rain falling against his face. A memory crowded him, in a spring night he was with friends at fairground. The tails of fireworks sinking up into the vault, in the distance lightning flickered. Lobes of purple and silver sent up into the heavens and the girl he had taken before stood alone beaneth the show, she turned to him, her face flowing with colours, and he in the dark, hiding and watching her. These were years he would like to forget. They are made to make you ache with want. He stood up, the sleeping girl was gone. His life was gone too. He came out enamored by the rot and the filth. Of the years spinning by, the pulsebeat of the world moving, moving along and some condition of how to be left unfounded, forever. Black daggers of my own heart. The spining world. All things not as they seem. See me: Memory. 


	THEN again. Down we go. 


He was alone. He worked all nights on his machine. He cursed who he worked with. He cursed their hearts and their heads and their souls. He bled into his machine. That moon. The machinist who made that moon he cursed. He cursed the art of it and screamed out against it. And the pain of knowing that the machinist whose hands when working were like dancing fires and whose art was everything, including him and his macine, was intolerable. He created angels in his room that were lies. And he bounded them and set to place them in the heavens among the stars and a stile of the earth: as a new thing under the sun. That old villain had then come to be with one of the agents against the machinist. A comrade against a maker whose art has been claimed to not be done under his authority. That each small creation was only possible frrom the machinist was the business he sought to annihilate. To make a world. A machine more real than reality that would open up a door and send the moon and stars to sink into a sea full of blood. To quake the mountains and bleed out the sky. That it was too powerful. Too beatiful. Only the heart could see it. Only his heart could know it. And war had commenced that day he set himself to burn against it, then weep for it, then scream against. That you die. That the dog dies. That the flowers die. That the stars do not dance but slowly turn on their courses down the horizon. This machine. This machine. Will plot the first powers against the night and day. Will give us a the first map of how to overcome. The authority who had given everything has not given us power. He will see us working. Building. Until He must face us. And speak to us on what he has done. Answer us. Roth in a fugue, tranced in the a phantasm of sick concepts. In a minecart through the bones and lunglike caverns that wail out in pain, down the black-dream door and chunneling as the skelter of wind gnashes against the trees made of human bones. Deliver us from you. Let me make a world in my room. He fell into regions that rocked and cradled chaotic sentient mutations of darkend energies, collettes of sussurus chants closed and opened, thousands of eyes on artlike molten bloomed and were burned and ghost forms of humans melted screaming on the horizons. He felt his brain being sucked into an acid fog. He felt his loins getting hard from the childlike pink girls with black tongues and all-blues eyes, with sinister heavens swirling in their irises. He worked and he worked by a candlelight that angered him. And a rain that he despised fell outside his window. 1000 niggres and faggots were drinking champagne somwhere with the young girls that sucked for fun and his heart was cut with a poision knife and he fell to tthe ground weak and empty. Roth, your girlfriend is at Speakeasy on Granville and a bartender with black paint on his nails is going to fuck her in the ass. She is not going to like it but she is going to do it beacuse she doesn't want you. Even a fat slob with black paint on  his nails and an earring is good enough. He will stuff his cock into her mouth and she will not like it and then he will not speak to her ever again. Can you hear me Nigger? Welcome to the place beyond the pines where you have found your companions. Your brothers. Remember to not dream of her body being used when you are in your little faggot room. Remember your machine, you pathetic cunt. The machine that blooms in your head when you are walking through a city of love. The One I have given to You. I am at control. You are my slave. I will use you then I will kill you. And before I kill you I will bring you more pain. He saw a worm covered in blood and mucous, with one eye locked in on him. It breathed a strange hell and he vomited manifold colours. He shook in a spasm on the floor. Shaking and straining and blooming into something horrible. He tried to get up but he was too weak. He fell into another hell. A thousand pages written by unknown hands swept into  a psychotic embrace and he killed the flowers and he killed his heart and he left himself dead beneath the throne under the true one. Rot and filth. A black rain falling. He stood outside his building and the crows watched him on the wires. The rain was coming. Everything was coming. Black out the sky and speak for once. You vicious ghost. Abovev the world they are dancing in the smells of perfumes, there are streams of beauty that flow and honey is sweet and soft. They are at a picnic. Enjoying the sun. They are laughing. They are petting their dogs. You are running from something. Something you did or have not done. 

	He drank from the tap shaking. He sat on the floor. He tried to feed himself but he couldn't. He tried but he could not. He walked away from the world and then it came to meet him. 



He met Nattie that night at The American. She watched him eat cheeseburgers. They kissed by the pool table and he held onto her tightly. He whispered I love you. More than anything in the world he whispered. The rain was dripping down the windows. The people were dancing. He was crowded by a vague agent he could not understand. Some thing that had hold on him, taking him away from everything. He sucked on her upper lip. In a madness. The pool table balls cracked behidn them. He could not remember that he wasn't playing. He could not remember anything. He saw himself among a dawn. A world at night. They escaped outside. Faint images flowed in his head. Faint dreams of something, the cars flowed down the road. The world flowed and flowed. Water of lights. Cars swimming. The fog clinging to everything. He counted the stars with her through the city light. One, two, three, four. I declare a thumb war. She was getting older. They were getting older. She was staying or she was going. They were staying or she was going. She was leaving and he was staying. They had one more beer in the crowded pub. Everyone was leaving and everyone was going. No one was going to stay. No one was going to be here anymore. She was always leaving even if she was staying. Everyone was leaving no matter where they were. He gripped his drink, for the machine had taken hold, yet her hair was like a remedy to all this violent blood, and she was summons to feel gone from that power that he had always known. The worship of something he had not known. The worship of the earth and the angels of the earth. The worship of all of them. He held to her and he hugged her drunk and his head was screaming with something that was missing, something was missing and it would not come, he had ravaged and killed and when it was dying he had spit on it. So he could not see. One moment. So he had to hide. 
	I think I'm going. 	
	No. 
	I am going. 
	In a month. 
	Forever. 
	Forever. Yeah...
	Ok, ok. 
	That night they went to the beach to see the fireworks show. They lifted off over the ocean. They lifted like scaling fires of life reflecting off the waters of death. They ran up and burst and the cloudes shone with them, and the clouds flowed gently and the crowd moved in a daze. He looked and she was crying. She cried and she smiled and leaned into him like a child and the blood in his bones felt cold, cold and warm and hot and sick and strange. 
	Now, the night was seeking him. As he walked her home she cried and cried again. Then she never talked him again.  She never answered her phone. 
	He went to the Metropole and had too much to drink and they stumbled across town to Malones. And they could see it. All of them in their. They could see that she was gone and he was alone. He killed himself again, because he wanted to end everything. For everything was gone and this was his life. 



In his dread he came to see that he had had chances to escape. And that all things warned of had come to pass.  As he lay on the floor. As she had dissapeared. As the stars fell by the thousands with none to see but the careless wolves and the prey longing for an island of paradise. These hands played in this fog of themes, playing, playing so softly with existing, playing with colours, playing the hectic storm of strange ecstasies in the night. He was working at a labour company. Setting the cement blocks of a condominium parking lot in North Vancouver. They didn't have masks for a week and he breathed in the cancerous powders. He'd go and lay in the park after work if it wasn't raining. If it was raining he'd go have a drink. They'd see his face and smile then they'd see his boots then the smiles would go away. Allegories bemoaning the truth. A machine to bleed out a truth made of lies, that is when the sky will quake and the world will fall. He worked for about 2 months and got a pretty good bit. He had to go down to Burnaby to get his final cheque. Some godless place of toyotas and condos. When he got it he checked his  bank account and he hated thinking about her and he hated that he had found another before she left and he hated that every path a web. The spider was at the end of every story. 
	Roth went to the Cowboy Bar on Hastings to see some forthright fellas. Natives and welfare boys. There was a karaoke machine and it could get rowdy.
	FBI, how's it?
	That's the big fuking indian. 
	Hey buddy.
	 Still got that pretty little girl?
	No she's gone. 
	Ahh. There's plenty of them. Plenty little dimsums around town. 
	Slurp slurp, he said. Without a smile. 
	They ordered a pitcher. A man in a wheelchair pulled up. 
	Roth, he said. A smile like a child. 
	They drank. FBI went out to smoke. Roth stayed in to drink. And drink. He got up and his chair fell down. He picked up it in an outrageous demeanor. He went to the bar. 
	You ok?
	I'm good. Another pitcher. 
	What happened? 
	Nothing much. How much?
	He paid. 
	He went back and filled up his glass and his head went back. He tried to call her. It didn't work. He went out the corner store and got some candy. He said some filth to the girl working there. He felt horrible. He came into the bar. He ordered whisky. And some more. And some more. And some more. His chair fell down again. He picked up and slammed down. 
	Hey, he heard from somewhere. 
	He picked it up and bashed it three times then he flung his glass across the room then he went outside and the rain was coming and he stumbled and mumbled like a creature in the night until he was in his bed breathing and shaking and wanting to kill. 
	Holy one, he cried. You set them up to knock them down. What is this? Death or no death. There is more. You will not be absolved of your crime. I will bring you to the judge of Man and you will speak of what you've done. I see little defense for this. Quite truly none at all. You are a disease. You should be treated as such. In the distance somewhere bells tolled and a harangue of chittering souls went out seeking to eviscerate themselves with a finality. To find the door to oblivion and straggle and claw themselves through the spinning alkahest of this system unknown. He stood up and puked in the sink. He turned on the tap and tried in some sense to fish the puke through the drain. The room spun like a dreidel, he turned his head with it only thinking one last chance and then he would be dead. The bloomed of days alone. He went outside to get some air. His balcony overlooked a thin alleyway. There she was. Stella...walking alone. She looked up at him. Her face so pale and her blue eyes almost burning. She wore a black hoody and the hood fell as she looked. He saw her dark hair and then she pulled up her hood and kept going to somewhere, she was like a watermark or more real than reality so she was vague and hardly there, softly floating through the spoils of herself, and the rain commenced yet again and the crows flew of the wires and dissapeared. 







In the morning he got a coffee at the matchaplace. He didn't speak. His hands were shaking. He sipped the coffee and his heart started pounding. He chucked in the garbage. He went and got a chocolate milk and powered up. He felt, not bad. Like in a dream for a little bit before it comes back. Alone before the throne of the allegded father you can whisper anything you like. You can try if you want. Try it when you are alone. Close your eyes, whisper to him, and see. He sat on the curb and drank his chocolate milk. He made sure to prepare himself rightly for the night. He showered and put on deodarant and brushed his teeth. He bought pens at a store. He didn't like stores. He didn't like stores or malls or anything that had stuff of any kind. It pissed him off.
	They met at a resteraunt in Gastown. He wore his only nice clothes. She was wearing a dress that was so beautiful. She wore the darkest lipstick and when she sat and he didn't speak she said: what?
	Nothing. 
	They ordered. 
	How is work, he said. 
	It's ok. 
	I want you to tell me that you will introduce me to your family and bring me to your friends and find a practical way out of your shithole, she did not say. 
	And you?
	I don't really do anything. Except my machine.
	Your machine. 
	Yes. 
	She looked into his eyes. She did not know what the machine really was. Neither did he. 
	They ate. 
	What is it? 
	What?
	The machine. 
	It's nothing really. 
	Nothing?
	I don't know if I will ever finish it. I keep breaking it. And I keep throwing it out. And I keep torturing it. And I keep telling it I hate it. And I stop doing it. Then I come back. And I can't stop. Even now I want to stop. But I will go back. Because it is calling me in.
	My english isn't very good. I don't understand. 
	I hate it. Like I hate the city. Like I hate that things starve and things are killed. And the world is corrupt. And I hate fancy shit because of it. Because they are starving out there and their is war and they are lying. Everyone is lying. They are playing pretend.  With everything. And it makes me feel violent. But I wish you were here. Because you are. And I got so drunk last night I couldn't even walk home. And I woke and thought how can I make myself ok for this. I only know that I will not make it through this. I am sure of it. Beacuse I told a whisper to a Thing that Lives and now it is in control. 
	No. I don't understand. I think you are just feeling hungover. 
	No. No one sees it.
	See what?
	It. 
	What?
	You can't see It. Or feel It. Can anyone?
	See what?
	What do you mean what? The It. The thing. That Is. 
	Tony... can we have some beer?
	He leaned back. 
	Ok. 
	They went down to street and walked into Gastown. He had was missing friends. He had none. He only had acquiantances and he didn't like them. His heart been poisoned. He had cursed the spirit. And snakes now at him with their fangs and he knew he was too be burned alive and burned whole. 



As the night came he had seen himself in a different light. He worked alone. He sat for a long time. Thinking about the world and his work. His machine. What its properties were and where it came from. How long ago and how much more would he have to fill himself against. If it was it violent enough. Did it scour the deeps as such things must. Was it life and death. Was it between meaning and meaninglessness. Would he be put on his own trial and did he create a powerful enough adversary in which he could then set to beat. Did it tell him something about the world. Was the world needed to be told anything? Did it kiss the ecstasy from beyond the world and did it hurt him more than anything else could. Did he follow himself through the fog. How did he fall? how did he fall? When it was over? How deep was that fall?  How long and how far. Casted in the flesh of stars, rushed down through the outer-reaches of heavens into an abstract basement to be cursed in a Room unchained from space and time. To sit in the depths haunting his own head then crawling back up to be a dancer, yes. A dancer A brilliant player of fiddles and lies. Oh you should here him play. It it is a wild thing when he plays. Roth scratched into his machine. He noticed something inside of himself was bleeding. Blood was coming down his chest. He put his finger to it and tried to wipe. But nothing was there. Nothing was there. He tried to open the corner of his room with a key. It would not budge. He tried to breathe the higher air and sit in Eastern worlds. There were none. None and less than none. Nothing. Absolute nothingness. Yet he heard the Voice, calling out: you will be ripped to shreds. Until you see her. Until you meet her...until you find her and she tells you the truth. Until you know her...don't you want to know her. To talk to her. And see her there as she is.


Stella got up and went to the mirror. She tied back her hair. She spoke from beyond the pale. Hello, Love. Are you there? Can you hear me? I am waiting for you. You never noticed me. I was always waiting. It didn't matter. It never mattered. Any of it. I was always waiting for you....


Roth went to see Yuna. They had not seen each other in about two months. They stopped seeing each other. Beacuse Roth was working on his Machine. Pink-lips. The fall breeze rushed against their coats. October of life. A year of being lost in the same place you have always been. He wanted to break something. As always. She wanted something but he did not know. How could I be so. Some leaves fell behind her as she came to him on the street. He battled everything he could. Everything he could. NOthing worked. Nothing. His hate sunk all energies out of him and nothing could be forseen if the world as not seen as good. And nothing would be given to him if he cursed the thing that fed him. Nothing will be given to you if you curse the thing that feeds you.  They went to get sushi in a nice resteraunt. His heart was villanous. He had given himself over and denied that hidden knowing that all live in so it took everything from him. He could not feel himself. He could not know himself. He could not become himself. 
	She wrote a dream that he could not get into his eyes. Into his heart. She looked at him and he knew everything she wanted, and it was so simple,  but he could not give it to her. He hated that he could not give it to her. So he hated her. He hated that he was working on his machine. He hated that they could not care less. He hated that the birds did not care. That the ocean would not weep with his machine in its heart. That the stars had no minds to know it, that the sun rose on its own accord and not on his right to existence. He hated that he was here with her because he looked a little better than others. He hated that that was the only reason. He hated seeing the young in their fathers BMW's and the girl with beauty coming out of the passenger seat. He hated the homeless. He hated that no one cared about them either. He reasoned with himself what the truth was of this world but was left broken among every time.. He wanted most to run in the forest as if made of it and if his skin could eat the sun like a flower and if his death would be an ecstasy of nature he would trade anything to rid himself and all memoery of his life to be one with it and not seperate. All this time he wanted to kill. Kill what. 



	In the machine, Mary was Stella's sister. Mary was saved by Stella in the woods. Where the shadows or wolves had defiled her. They went to Vancouver. Mary was much more beautiful than her. She went where the world was while Stella made money for herself at night selling drugs. At night she would see her sister painted up in the neon lights of cocktail bars. Laughing in ravishment. Pale fallings of a colorful world leaving. Colours lost. She sat on benches waiting for the Irish or eager lonely men to come collect their fixes. She carried a switch blade in her back pocket. She thought about slicing their thighs from time to time. And if it was ok to think about that. Then coming home she saw in the alleyway a man with a blade, playing and dancing in the rain with a knife. So beautifully he danced and moved, and held it to the light like an actor on a stage. 
	You came to these places with no right to your wretchedness. What did you come to see here? What did you leave to see? A reed swaying in the wind? A drunk sleeping on the street? You came to see one and one thing only. Something not made of blood or stone. She came closer to him. See I speak to no one. Not even ghosts. I speak only to the rain. The rain is like me. It exists and it has its gradual extinction. Like everything. It slowly wanes without cause or concern. It fills and replinshes and chokes and straves and can come soft or violently. It has no placement and no distinction. It speaks: of nothing but itself. And it doesn't know it speaks. Only we hear it. And in this constraint I play freely with my blade and dance in the alleys and slice and I know nothing else.  For I have seen the bars and the laggard and the broken and I have seen the towers and the rich and I have seen it so clearly. Only the rain will you commit yourself to. Nothing else need be followed. Nothing. She was madly in love. Horribly in love. It felt like black worms were in her stomach trying to eat her heart. 

	They walked like ghosts where he had walked. They moved as he had. They sat beside him in bars. They spoke in his head but he heard them outside. He played with them. And they played with him. They were made of the stuff in his heart. Yet he did not know what that was. Manifested they ran through the city. In the cold by bus stops coming home from work he would see them, leaning against each other under bus stops. He would see them beaming. He would follow them until they vanished out of the air. His head would implode and he would fall to the earth. Now let the dogs have you. For you are so far gone you can never recover. 
	In senses by candlelight Roth attempted to acquit himself of this rot but some other thing would not let happen. He worked on a small part of his machine. As judge and juror of his own reckoning and the defendant spoke from a veil behind a shadow of himself: this is not actual. My client must be released on all charges for the manmade logos has no validity in a world of a stone indifference. The judge complied. The slender jurors nodded their heads. But Roth began to shake violently and cursed this dispensation of radicals. The reason he had screamed was nothing he could understand and a collette closed and he entered darkness. He put his tears into a small vial and walked on what looked like the banks leading to Acheron. He came to that place where the paupers waited for the ferry men to take them into the outer darkness. They embraced him. Roth, they said. Roth, with their hands above their heads. Oh sweety, sweety, you're home. 

	They walked in the rain. Roth followed them. They went down the alleys in China-town. Roth followed them  inside. He ran his fingers down the bricks like a madman. He looked at all of them there. Starved and addicted. Ripped to shreds by what? Themselves? Then why were most of them Indians? Who makes the judgement of them when the judge itself and all of history must be put on trial.


	He or her went to speak to them in one night of many pains. He sat in the rain with his hood over his head and gathered them to him. They were cold and they were wiping their faces. They were sick and they were sad and they were weak. But their eyes like childrens eyes. But their bodies lifetimes beyond repair. Roth spoke: If you were to dream of a figure coming into this alleyway and speaking to you as I am, and telling you that you will meet someone who comes into this alleyway, and tells you that you were lost out of your hate for the world and nothing else. That you are here on your own accord and nothing else is responsible for your life. And this figure was himself in a war between heaven and hell, and you felt he himself was between the truth, that he did not know he was lying, and in these words you felt the terror of the world, more powerfully than you ever had, what would you say this dream was about? And if a real figure had come and said the same thing would you claim a spirit existed. If he told you that to see this as a dream. From the sheer reality of this truly happening. Would you say it is impossible for there not to be a spirit because he speaks. Words come out of his mouth. He speaks of dreams that are real. And falsely accuses us of wrongful sacrifice. 


	Stella went out late at night to seek the place where she was to put an explosive. She had created it with him in his apartment. She had  a small micro-processor in which she fitted and LED screen. A butterfly would blink 10 times until becoming white. White like an albino scalper or a whale from the deeps that feeds on humans. Then it would explode. It was made from the butane cannisters the addcits used to smoke. She would draw on the alley wall with white spray paint a circle with a line. The line below the bottom of the circle stretching slightly slower as if a something to be planted in the ground. She squirmed on the floor when she thought about. She did not know what it was.  She had watched her junkie friend turn pale only a week ago before dying. They had talked together on the beaches. At night they'd watch the tankers far off move slow across the dark and where they went, far off from downtown Vancouver, they could see thousands of stars. They talked about life and much more. Her friend would lean back and fall on the sand well knowing it was over. Then, a few days later. Stella got a message. She went outside her apartment and there she was, leaning on the alley, dead as a stone. 
	Buddy, no. Buddy wake up. 
	But she could not wake up. 
	Buddy please, wake up. Wake up. Just wake up. 
	The knife in her back pocket felt hot. She looked up to the sky as if to cut it open so it would be bleed. This place is where the niggers are. This is where the niggers are. 

























Black-Stars have wandered with themselves among the light of cracked lanterns that splay the ground abstract on the worst places of cities. They are bound within diagonal dreams of themselves and move through distorted maps hiding in their hearts. The band plays in their dins off-beat and slow. They drink the moonlight and the work is little or none. They have wanted something, they have wanted something right at the moment when the wolf sees and starts to run. Right at that moment he runs they are starved for that. We are all starving for it. Stella you are dreaming of me? You are dreaming of me aren't you?
	












	She knew him. They knew each other. They knew who he was. And they knew everything. 





	















	He called her the next day. I don't think I can see you anymore. Because I'm too busy. 
	Ok. 
	Ok?
	Ok. Yes, I understand. r



















Then he saw her again. In the sky. Bleeding. Devi. Devi bleed more tonight. He grabbed the door of his apartment. Cold like this autumn night. I will go back in. But do not hurt me. But, I need more. 











When you go you will see him. 




	

Now. Are we not there yet?











	
